Washington statutes.
RCW 35.79.040

Title to vacated street or alley.

If any street or alley in any city or town is vacated by the city or town council, the property within the limits so vacated shall belong to the abutting property owners, one-half to each.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.79.040. Prior: 1901 c 84 s 3; RRS s 9299.]